Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1514
Land resources; public policy.

It is hereby declared to be the public policy of the State of Nebraska to achieve and maintain such a reasonable degree of purity of the land resources of the state as will protect human health and safety, and, to the greatest degree practicable, prevent injury to plant and animal life and property, foster the comfort and convenience of the people, promote the economic and social development of the state, protect the scenic beauty of the state, facilitate the enjoyment of the natural attractions of the state, and to provide for the prevention, abatement and control of new or existing land pollution.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 14.